California statutes. Public Utilities Code
 to industries or business entities whose facilities are located or will be located within the boundaries of enterprise zones, recycling market development zones, or economic incentive areas pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (e). These discounts may be applied in either of the following ways:

(1) Utilities may apply reduced monthly rates to qualifying customers’ monthly utility bills.

(2) Utilities may, at the election of qualifying customers, assign the discounts to a private or public entity that returns consideration of like value to those customers, provided the customers agree to maintain their facilities in an enterprise zone, a recycling market development zone, or an economic incentive area for a minimum of five years from the date of commencement of the discount.

(h) It is the intent of the Legislature
 that the Public Utilities Commission, in implementing this chapter, shall allow rate recovery of expenses and rate discounts supporting economic development programs within the geographic area served by any public utility to the extent the utility incurring or proposing to incur those expenses and rate discounts demonstrates that the ratepayers of the public utility will derive a benefit from those programs. Further, it is the intent of the Legislature that expenses for economic development programs incurred prior to the effective date of this chapter, which have not been previously authorized to be recovered in rates, shall not be subject to rate recovery.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 17, Sec. 127.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

740.5.

(a) For purposes of this section, “21st Century Energy System Decision” means commission Decision 12-12-031 (December 20, 2012), Decision Granting Authority to Enter Into a Research and Development Agreement with Lawrence Livermore National Laboratory for 21st Century Energy Systems and for costs up to one hundred fifty-two million one hundred ninety thousand dollars ($152,190,000) or any subsequent decision in Application 11-07-008 (July 18, 2011), Application of Pacific Gas and Electric Company (U39M), San Diego Gas and Electric Company (U902E), and Southern California Edison Company (U338E) for Authority to Increase Electric Rates and Charges to Recover Costs of Research and Development Agreement with Lawrence Livermore National Laboratory for 21st Century Energy Systems.

(b) In implementing the 21st Century Energy System Decision, the commission shall not authorize recovery from ratepayers of any expense for research and development projects that are not for purposes of cyber security and grid integration. Total funding for research and development projects for purposes of cyber security and grid integration pursuant to the 21st Century Energy System Decision shall not exceed thirty-five million dollars ($35,000,000). All cyber security and grid integration research and development projects shall be concluded by the fifth anniversary of their start date.

(c) The commission shall not approve for recovery from ratepayers those program management expenditures proposed, commencing with page seven, in the joint advice letter filed by the state’s three largest electrical corporations, Advice 3379-G/4215-E (Pacific Gas and Electric Company), Advice 2887-E
 (Southern California Edison Company), and Advice 2473-E (San Diego Gas and Electric Company), dated April 19, 2013. Project managers for the 21st Century Energy System Decision shall be limited to three representatives, one representative each from Pacific Gas and Electric Company, Southern California Edison Company, and San Diego Gas and Electric Company.

(d) The commission shall require the Lawrence Livermore National Laboratory, as a condition for entering into any contract pursuant to the 21st Century Energy System Decision, and Pacific Gas and Electric Company, Southern California Edison Company, and San Diego Gas and Electric Company to ensure that research parameters reflect a new contribution to cyber security and that there not be a duplication of research being done by other private and governmental entities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 842, Sec. 15.   (SB 1222)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

740.6.

(a) The commission may authorize investor-owned gas and electric utilities to match grants provided to nonprofit agencies and local governments to participate in the Department of Economic Opportunity’s pilot program to identify and counsel low-income individuals and group facilities that are eligible to receive rate discounts and weatherization benefits offered by those utilities. The amount of utility matching funds for the pilot program shall be limited to a statewide total of three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000). The commission shall
 require that utility expenditures for those purposes be recoverable in rates.

(b) If federal funds become available for low-income energy assistance or weatherization programs that may be secured with matching funds from states or utilities, the commission may authorize investor-owned gas and electric utilities to match those federal funds, and shall require that utility expenditures for those purposes be recoverable in rates.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1159, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

740.7.

Interruptible service or curtailment programs adopted by the commission shall assure that the programs allow customers to aggregate multiple accounts to meet any minimum kilowatt requirements for participation in the program, subject to geographical, load, and other parameters, as determined by the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 7, Sec. 7.   Effective April 12, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

740.8.

As used in Section 740.3 or 740.12, “interests” of ratepayers, short- or long-term, mean direct benefits that are specific to ratepayers, consistent with both of the following:

(a) Safer, more reliable, or less costly gas or electrical service, consistent with Section 451, including electrical service that is safer, more reliable, or less costly due to either
 improved use of the electric system or improved integration of renewable energy generation.

(b) Any one of the following:

(1) Improvement in energy efficiency of travel.

(2) Reduction of health and environmental impacts from air pollution.

(3) Reduction of greenhouse gas emissions related to electricity and natural gas production and use.

(4) Increased use of alternative fuels.

(5) Creating high-quality jobs or other economic benefits, including in disadvantaged communities identified pursuant to Section 39711 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 547, Sec. 31.   (SB 350)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

740.9.

(a) Any optional binding mandatory curtailment program adopted by the commission that exempts customers from Stage 3 rotating outages in exchange for partial load curtailments during every rotating outage period shall provide, for agricultural and water supplier customers, the use of backup generation to offset the curtailed load under the program, to the extent the use of backup generation is allowed under existing law, including, but not limited to, all relevant local air pollution control district and air quality management district rules and
 regulations.

(b) As used in this section, “agricultural customers” means any customer involved in the production of or processing of agricultural products. “Water suppliers” means those water agencies or suppliers as defined in Section 20200 of the Water Code and Section 241 of the Public Utilities Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 7, Sec. 8.   Effective April 12, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

740.10.

(a) Each public utility electrical corporation shall develop and offer its customers, on or before May 30, 2001, the opportunity to participate, in addition to other programs developed by the commission, in a demand reduction program as described in this section.

(b) The program required by this section shall identify specific periods coincident with morning or evening system peak conditions determined by the Independent System Operator within which the customer agrees to drop a
 preset amount of load. This program shall be known as the Scheduled Load Reduction Program. The commission shall develop appropriate incentives for customers to participate in the program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 7, Sec. 9.   Effective April 12, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

740.11.

In recognition of the fact that agricultural and water supplier customers necessarily have high electricity usage during peak summer demand periods, the Legislature strongly urges the commission to consider providing the option to all agricultural commodity processing customers to be included in the definition of customers eligible to be served under agricultural tariffs, consistent with its other constitutional and statutory objectives, and to the extent it does not result in cost shifting to other customer classes.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 7, Sec. 10.   Effective April 12, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

740.12.

(a) (1) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(A) Advanced clean vehicles and fuels are needed to reduce petroleum use, to meet air quality standards, to improve public health, and to achieve greenhouse gas emissions reduction goals.

(B) Widespread transportation electrification is needed to achieve the goals of the Charge Ahead California Initiative (Chapter 8.5 (commencing with Section 44258) of Part 5 of Division 26 of the Health and Safety Code).

(C) Widespread transportation electrification requires increased access for
 disadvantaged communities, low- and moderate-income communities, and other consumers of zero-emission and near-zero-emission vehicles, and increased use of those vehicles in those communities and by other consumers to enhance air quality, lower greenhouse gases emissions, and promote overall benefits to those communities and other consumers.

(D) Reducing emissions of greenhouse gases to 40 percent below 1990 levels by 2030 and to 80 percent below 1990 levels by 2050 will require widespread transportation electrification.

(E) Widespread transportation electrification requires electrical corporations to increase access to the use of electricity as a transportation fuel.

(F) Widespread transportation electrification should
 stimulate innovation and competition, enable consumer options in charging equipment and services, attract private capital investments, and create high-quality jobs for Californians, where technologically feasible.

(G) Deploying electric vehicles should assist in grid management, integrating generation from eligible renewable energy resources, and reducing fuel costs for vehicle drivers who charge in a manner consistent with electrical grid conditions.

(H) Deploying electric vehicle charging infrastructure should facilitate increased sales of electric vehicles by making charging easily accessible and should provide the opportunity to access electricity as a fuel that is cleaner and less costly than gasoline or other fossil fuels in public and private locations.

(I) According to the State Alternative Fuels Plan analysis by the Energy Commission and the State Air Resources Board, light-, medium-, and heavy-duty vehicle electrification results in approximately 70 percent fewer greenhouse gases emitted, over 85 percent fewer ozone-forming air pollutants emitted, and 100 percent fewer petroleum used. These reductions will become larger as renewable generation increases.

(2) It is the policy of the state and the intent of the Legislature to encourage transportation electrification as a means to achieve ambient air quality standards and the state’s climate goals. Agencies designing and implementing regulations, guidelines, plans, and funding programs to reduce greenhouse gas emissions shall take the findings described in paragraph (1) into
 account.

(b) The commission, in consultation with the State Air Resources Board and the Energy Commission, shall direct electrical corporations to file applications for programs and investments to accelerate widespread transportation electrification to reduce dependence on petroleum, meet air quality standards, achieve the goals set forth in the Charge Ahead California Initiative (Chapter 8.5 (commencing with Section 44258) of Part 5 of Division 26 of the Health and Safety Code), and reduce emissions of greenhouse gases to 40 percent below 1990 levels by 2030 and to 80 percent below 1990 levels by 2050. Programs proposed by electrical corporations shall seek to minimize overall costs and maximize overall benefits. The commission shall approve, or modify and approve, programs and investments in transportation electrification, including
 those that deploy charging infrastructure, via a reasonable cost recovery mechanism, if they are consistent with this section, do not unfairly compete with nonutility enterprises as required under Section 740.3, include performance accountability measures, and are in the interests of ratepayers as defined in Section 740.8. Not less than 35 percent of the investments pursuant to this subdivision shall be in underserved communities as that term is defined in Section 1601.

(c) The commission shall review data concerning current and future electric transportation adoption and charging infrastructure utilization prior to authorizing an electrical corporation to collect new program costs related to transportation electrification in customer rates. If market barriers unrelated to the investment made by an electric corporation prevent electric
 transportation from adequately utilizing available charging infrastructure, the commission shall not permit additional investments in transportation electrification without a reasonable showing that the investments would not result in long-term stranded costs recoverable from ratepayers.

(d) This section applies to an application to the commission for transportation electrification programs and investments if one of the following conditions is met:

(1) The application is filed on or after January 1, 2016.

(2) The application is filed before January 1, 2016, but has an evidentiary hearing scheduled on or after July 1, 2016.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 372, Sec. 1.   (AB 841)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

740.13.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Charging station” means the removable equipment that provides alternating or direct current to the battery electric vehicle or plug-in hybrid electric vehicle, but does not include the supporting charging infrastructure, such as wiring, conduit, and electric panel.

(2) “Educational institution” has the same meaning as defined in Section 22129 of the Education Code.

(3) “School facility” means owned or leased improved real property used for the purpose of the private or public education of more than 12 children in kindergarten or any of grades 1 to 12, inclusive, or in any combination thereof, or any other facility of a school district or county office of education where activities described in subdivision (c) are provided, but does not include any private school in which education is conducted primarily in private homes.

(b) By July 30, 2018, an electrical corporation may file with the commission a pilot program proposal for the installation of electrical grid integrated charging stations at school facilities and other educational institutions. The proposal may include parameters for the installation of charging infrastructure for transportation vehicles, such as schoolbuses, owned by a school district, county office of education,
 private school, or other educational institution. By December 31, 2018, the commission shall review, modify if appropriate, and decide whether to approve a pilot program proposal filed by an electrical corporation.

(c) A school district, county office of education, private school, or other educational institution choosing to participate in the program shall have the authority to establish guidelines for use of the charging stations installed pursuant to the approved program, which may include use by faculty, students, and parents, before, during, and after school hours at those times that the school facilities or other educational institutions are operated for purposes of providing education or school-related activities, including, but not limited to, parent-teacher conferences, clubs, theater, and athletic events, and by any
 other persons present for those activities and events.

(d) Construction and maintenance of the charging stations and infrastructure shall be managed in coordination with the school district, county office of education, private school, or other educational institution.

(e) The approved pilot program shall include a reasonable mechanism for cost recovery by the electrical corporation if the commission finds all of the following are true:

(1) The costs to be recovered are consistent with a cost limitation approved by the commission for the
 pilot program.

(2) The pilot program seeks to minimize overall costs and maximize overall benefits.

(3) The pilot program does not unfairly compete with nonutility enterprises as required under Section 740.3.

(4) The pilot program includes performance accountability measures.

(5) The pilot program is in the interests of ratepayers, as defined in Section 740.8.

(f) Charging stations installed pursuant to a pilot program approved by the commission pursuant to this section shall be installed and maintained by the utility workforce, or by workers who are paid the prevailing wage for all
 program-related work. The Director of Industrial Relations shall determine the prevailing wage in accordance with the standards set forth in Article 2 (commencing with Section 1770) of Chapter 1 of Part 7 of Division 2 of the Labor Code. A nonutility enterprise installing or maintaining charging stations and infrastructure pursuant to a pilot program approved by the commission shall submit wage schedules to the commission as part of its application and shall make all payroll records available to the commission for enforcement purposes pursuant to this part. Certified payrolls submitted to the commission shall be public records.

(g) A school facility or other
 educational institution receiving charging stations pursuant to the approved pilot program shall participate in a time-variant rate approved by the commission. A school district, county office of education, private school, or other educational institution may require users of the charging stations to pay electricity costs.

(h) An electrical corporation shall prioritize in its proposal school facilities and other educational institutions located in disadvantaged communities. For these purposes, “disadvantaged communities” means communities identified by the California Environmental Protection Agency pursuant to the Greenhouse Gas Reduction Fund Investment Plan and Communities Revitalization Act (Chapter 4.1 (commencing with Section 39710) of Part 2 of Division 26 of the Health and Safety Code).

(i) Participation in the approved pilot program shall not prevent a school district, county office of education, private school, or other educational institution from participating in other transportation electrification programs. After a school district, county office of education, private school, or other educational institution has participated in the program for eight years, the school district, county office of education, private school, or other educational institution may cease participation in the pilot program and request removal of the charging
 station by providing 180-day notice to the electrical corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 637, Sec. 2.   (AB 1082)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

740.14.

(a) By July 30, 2018, in consultation with the Department of Parks and Recreation, Public Utilities Commission, Energy Commission, and State Air Resources Board, each electrical corporation may file with the commission a pilot program proposal for the installation of electrical grid integrated charging stations at state parks and beaches within its service territory. By December 31, 2018, the commission shall review, modify if appropriate, and decide whether to approve a pilot program proposal filed by an electrical corporation. The Department of Parks and Recreation shall determine which state parks or beaches are suitable for charging stations.

(b) The approved
 pilot program shall include a reasonable mechanism for cost recovery by an electrical corporation if the commission finds all of the following are true:

(1) The costs to be recovered are consistent with a cost limitation approved by the commission for the pilot program.

(2) The pilot program seeks to minimize overall costs and maximize overall benefits.

(3) The pilot program does not unfairly compete with nonutility enterprises as required under Section 740.3.

(4) The pilot program includes performance accountability measures for the electrical corporation or, for charging equipment installed and maintained by a nonutility enterprise, performance
 accountability measures for the nonutility enterprise.

(5) The pilot program is in the interests of ratepayers, as defined in Section 740.8.

(c) Charging stations installed pursuant to a pilot program approved by the commission pursuant to this section shall be installed and maintained by the utility workforce, or by workers who are paid the prevailing wage for all program-related work. The Director of Industrial Relations shall determine the prevailing wage in accordance with the standards set forth in Article 2 (commencing with Section 1770) of Chapter 1 of Part 7 of Division 2 of the Labor Code. A nonutility enterprise installing or maintaining charging equipment pursuant to a pilot program approved by the commission shall submit wage schedules to the commission as part of
 its application and shall make all payroll records available to the commission for enforcement purposes pursuant to this part. Certified payrolls submitted to the commission shall be public records.

(d) State parks and beaches receiving charging stations pursuant to the approved pilot program shall participate in a time-variant rate approved by the commission.

(e) An electrical corporation shall prioritize in its proposal those state parks and beaches that serve residents of disadvantaged communities. For these purposes, “disadvantaged communities” means communities identified by the California Environmental Protection Agency pursuant to the Greenhouse Gas Reduction Fund Investment Plan and Communities Revitalization Act (Chapter 4.1 (commencing with Section 39710) of Part 2
 of Division 26 of the Health and Safety Code).

(f) Except for costs incurred in determining park and beach suitability pursuant to subdivision (a) and potential liability under the Government Claims Act (Division 3.6 (commencing with Section 810) of Title 1 of the Government Code), the Department of Parks and Recreation shall not be required to incur any costs or liability related to the installation, use, or maintenance of the
 charging stations for the pilot program’s duration.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 638, Sec. 2.   (AB 1083)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

740.15.

(a) The commission shall consider, in an existing proceeding, all of the following:

(1) Facilitating the development of technologies that promote grid integration, including technologies that provide submetering capabilities to residential charging stations, if the commission determines that these technologies and submetering capabilities are in the best interests of ratepayers.

(2) Exploring policies that support the development of technologies and rate strategies that can reduce the effects of demand charges on electric vehicle drivers and fleets, and help accelerate the adoption of electric vehicles. 

(3) Adopting
 a tariff specific to heavy-duty electric vehicle fleets or electric trucks and buses that encourages the use of charging stations when there is excess grid capacity.

(b) For purposes of this section, “charging station” means the removable equipment that provides alternating or direct current to the battery electric vehicle or plug-in hybrid electric vehicle, but does not include the supporting charging infrastructure, such as wiring, conduit, and electric panels.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 368, Sec. 4.   (SB 1000)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

740.16.

(a) (1) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(A) State policy incentivizes and encourages the increased use of electric vehicles, and relies, in part, on the ratepayers of electrical corporations to fund policies intended to increase the usage of electric vehicles.

(B) Changes in electrical demand and generation have created escalating peak and low periods of electrical supply and demand, and the cost of wholesale electricity and electricity delivery during peak demand periods is typically greater than during other periods.

(C) It is feasible and practicable to adjust the
 period during which an electric vehicle charges, in part or in full, to reduce its cost impact during periods of peak demand or grid congestion, to utilize available renewable electric generation, to avoid curtailments of renewable electric generation, and to provide reliability services.

(D) Time-of-use rates for customers with electric vehicles can reduce costs or mitigate cost increases for all ratepayers due to increased usage of electric vehicles by incentivizing electric vehicle charging at periods of low demand and low grid congestion.

(2) It is, therefore, the policy of the state and the intent of the Legislature to maximize net ratepayer and grid benefits from transportation electrification and reduce costs or mitigate cost increases for all ratepayers due to increased usage of electric vehicles by accelerating electric vehicle grid integration and by ensuring that any
 investments in transportation electrification do not foreclose the electric vehicle grid integration potential of these investments.

(b) (1) For purposes of this section, “electric vehicle grid integration” means any method of altering the time, charging level, or location at which grid-connected electric vehicles charge or discharge, in a manner that optimizes plug-in electric vehicle interaction with the electrical grid and provides net benefits to ratepayers by doing any of the following:

(A) Increasing electrical grid asset utilization.

(B) Avoiding otherwise necessary distribution infrastructure upgrades.

(C) Integrating renewable energy resources.

(D) Reducing
 the cost of electricity supply.

(E) Offering reliability services consistent with Section 380 or the Independent System Operator tariff.

(2) Electric vehicle grid integration strategies shall not require the use of any specific technology.

(3) Electric vehicle grid integration may be achieved using multiple strategies, including, but not limited to, the adoption of an electrical rate design, a technology, or a customer service, if that adoption helps provide net benefits to ratepayers pursuant to paragraph (1).

(4) The commission may adopt a revised definition for “electric vehicle grid integration” through a new or existing proceeding to replace the definition in paragraph (1). Any revised definition of “electric vehicle grid integration” adopted by
 the commission shall be applicable to load-serving entities, as defined in Section 380.

(c) By December 31, 2020, in an existing proceeding, the commission shall establish strategies and quantifiable metrics to maximize the use of feasible and cost-effective electric vehicle grid integration by January 1, 2030, consistent with all of the following:

(1) The electric vehicle grid integration strategies shall account for the effect of time-of-use rates on electricity demand from electric vehicle charging.

(2) Expenditures on electric vehicle grid integration shall be in the best interests of ratepayers, as defined in Section 740.8, and consistent with Section 451.

(3) The electric vehicle grid integration strategies shall reflect electrical demand
 attributable to electric vehicle charging, including from existing approved rates and programs.

(4) Electric vehicle grid integration shall be consistent with the transportation electrification goals described in Section 740.12.

(5) The commission shall consider incorporating the National Institute of Standards and Technology’s reliability and cybersecurity protocols, or other equally protective or more protective cybersecurity protocols, into the electric vehicle grid integration strategies.

(d) As part of each local publicly owned electric utility’s integrated resource plan update adopted on and after January 1, 2020, pursuant to Section 9621, the local publicly owned electric utility shall consider both of the following:

(1) Establishing electric
 vehicle grid integration strategies that are in the best interests of ratepayers and that reflect the local publicly owned electric utility’s estimated electrical demand attributable to electric vehicle charging, as applicable.

(2) Evaluating how its existing and planned electric vehicle grid integration programs, including its electrical rates and investments in transportation electrification, to the extent feasible, further the electric vehicle grid integration strategies it has established, as applicable.

(e) In carrying out its responsibilities pertaining to transportation electrification, including, but not limited to, pursuant to Sections 740.2, 740.3, 740.8, 740.12, 740.13, and 740.14, the commission shall reference the electric vehicle grid integration strategies established pursuant to subdivision (c) in relevant ongoing and
 subsequent proceedings that address issues of transportation electrification in any part and shall identify how programs and investments that the commission may approve will advance the achievement of the strategies.

(f) In executing its responsibilities on transportation electrification, including, but not limited to, pursuant to Sections 740.2, 740.3, 740.8, 740.12, 740.13, and 740.14, the commission shall consider how, or if, electric vehicle grid integration can mitigate any generation, transmission, or distribution costs, or increase the economic, social, or environmental benefits associated with transportation electrification, and shall not foreclose future utilization of electric vehicle grid integration.

(g) Each community choice aggregator shall, one year after the commission establishes electric vehicle grid integration strategies pursuant to subdivision (c), report
 annually to the commission describing how its current and planned programs, rates, and investments in transportation electrification are expected to further the electric vehicle grid integration strategies.

(h) Each electrical corporation shall, in each of its applications to the commission for transportation electrification programs and investments filed pursuant to Section 740.12, quantify how the investments described in the application are expected to further the electric vehicle grid integration strategies adopted pursuant to subdivision (c).

(i) Each electrical corporation that files an application for programs and investments to accelerate widespread transportation electrification pursuant to Section 740.12 shall, in each of its load research report compliance filings or alternative compliance filings submitted to the commission, report the electrical corporation’s annual
 measurable progress in furthering the electric vehicle grid integration strategies adopted pursuant to subdivision (c).

(j) The commission shall, in an existing proceeding, review each load-serving entity’s annual measurable progress in furthering the electric vehicle grid integration strategies adopted pursuant to subdivision (c), and may, if appropriate, issue recommendations to ensure reasonable progress toward achieving vehicle grid integration.

(k) Nothing in this section authorizes a delay of any new rate or program for electric vehicle charging or electric vehicle grid integration as to which consideration or approval is pending before the commission on or before January 1, 2020.

(l) As regards electrical corporations, this section shall only apply to electrical corporations that are required to file an
 integrated resource plan pursuant to Section 454.52.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 484, Sec. 1.   (SB 676)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

740.18.

(a) The purpose of this section is to require the commission to review, modify, if appropriate, and decide whether to approve, two pending (as of July 1, 2020) transportation electrification infrastructure applications, based on previously approved activities, that are designed to advance California’s goal of widespread transportation electrification, and to require the commission to extend its prior approvals of transportation electrification programs and investments so that they will be replicated and continued. These commission decisions will have the effect of continuing to build out California’s transportation electrification infrastructure, improve air quality, reduce emissions of greenhouse gases, create jobs, and
 put downward pressure on rates. Nothing in this section is intended to preclude the commission from adopting additional transportation electrification programs and investments.

(b) On or before March 1, 2021, the commission shall issue decisions concerning Application 18-06-015 (June 26, 2018) Application of Southern California Edison Company (U338E) for Approval of its Charge Ready 2 Infrastructure and Market Education Programs and Application 19-10-012 (October 28, 2019) Application Of San Diego Gas & Electric Company (U902E) To Extend And Modify The Power Your Drive Pilot Approved By Decision 16-01-045.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 372, Sec. 2.   (AB 841)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

740.19.

(a) The purpose of this section is to change the commission practice of authorizing the electrical distribution infrastructure located on the utility side of the customer meter needed to charge electric vehicles on a case-by-case basis to a practice of considering that infrastructure and associated design, engineering, and construction work as core utility business, treated the same as other distribution infrastructure authorized on an ongoing basis in the electrical corporation’s general rate case. The commission should not relegate charging electric vehicles to a lower status than any other use of electricity for which the electrical corporation provides distribution infrastructure. The commission shall continue to require
 each electrical corporation to provide an accurate and full accounting of all expenses related to electrical distribution infrastructure as it relates to this section, and apply appropriate penalties to the extent an electrical corporation is not accurately tracking all expenses.

(b) For purposes of this section, the term “electrical distribution infrastructure” shall include poles, vaults, service drops, transformers, mounting pads, trenching, conduit, wire, cable, meters, other equipment as necessary, and associated engineering and civil construction work. 

(c) Not later than February 28, 2021, each electrical corporation shall file an advice letter pursuant to Section 5.1 of General Order 96-B, for, and not later than June 30, 2021, the commission shall approve, a new
 tariff or rule that authorizes each electrical
 corporation to design and deploy all electrical distribution infrastructure on the utility side of the customer’s meter for all customers installing separately metered infrastructure to support charging stations, other than those in single-family residences. The advice letter and the commission’s approval shall provide that costs incurred by the electrical corporation between January 1, 2021, and the implementation date of rates approved in the next general rate case decision for that electrical corporation shall be tracked in a memorandum account and recovered, subject to a reasonableness review, in the decision adopting the next general rate case revenue requirement for that electrical corporation. Each electrical
 corporation shall recover its subsequent revenue requirement for this work through periodic general rate case proceedings. In those proceedings, the costs shall be treated like those costs incurred for other necessary distribution infrastructure. The new tariff shall replace the line extension rules currently used (as of July 1, 2020) and any customer allowances established shall be based on the full useful life of the electrical distribution infrastructure. The commission may revise the policy described in subdivision (a) and this subdivision after the completion of the general rate case cycle of the electrical corporation following the one during which the advice letter was filed if a determination is made that a change in the policy is necessary to ensure just and reasonable rates for ratepayers.

(d) (1) For purposes
 of this subdivision, the following terms have the following meanings:

(A) “Basic charging arrangements” means Level 1 and Level 2 charging in accordance with the SAE J1772 standard, or a replacement standard that the commission determines to be appropriate.

(B) “D. 11-07-029” means commission Decision 11-07-029 (July 14, 2011) Phase 2 Decision Establishing Policies to Overcome Barriers to Electric Vehicle Deployment and Complying with Section 740.2 of the Public Utilities Code, made in Rulemaking 09-08-009 (August 20, 2009) Order Instituting Rulemaking on the Commission’s Own Motion to Consider Alternative-Fueled Vehicle Tariffs, Infrastructure and Policies to Support California’s Greenhouse Gas Emissions Reduction Goals.

(C) “D. 13-06-014” means commission Decision 13-06-014 (June 27, 2013) Decision Authorizing Short-Term Extension of Limited Provisions Regarding Electric Tariff Rules 15 and 16, made in Rulemaking 09-08-009.

(D) “D. 16-06-011” means commission Decision 16-06-011 (June 9, 2016) Decision Authorizing Further Extension of the Interim Policy Regarding Electric Tariff Rules 15 and 16, made in Rulemaking 13-11-007 (November 14, 2013) Order Instituting Rulemaking to Consider Alternative-Fueled Vehicle Programs, Tariffs, and Policies.

(E) “D. 16-11-005” means commission Decision 16-11-005 (November 10, 2016) Decision Making Small Electrical Corporations Respondents to this Rulemaking, made in Rulemaking 13-11-007.

(F) “PEV charging” means plug-in electric vehicle charging.

(G) “R. 18-12-066” means commission Rulemaking 18-12-006 (December 13, 2018) Order Instituting Rulemaking to Continue the Development of Rates and Infrastructure for Vehicle Electrification.
